Maine, session 132, LD1285.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §10018 is enacted to read:
§10018. Legacy and donor preference prohibited
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Donor preference" means a preference given to an applicant to an educational
institution based on the applicant's familial relationship to a person who provides or
provided financial support to the institution.
B. "Educational institution" or "institution" means any postsecondary educational
institution incorporated or chartered under the laws of this State.
C. "Legacy preference" means a preference given to an applicant to an educational
institution based on the applicant's familial relationship to a graduate of the institution.
2. Prohibition. An educational institution may not consider a legacy preference or
donor preference when determining admission to the institution.
3. Data collection. This section may not be construed to prohibit an educational
institution from asking an applicant to provide information about familial relationships to
graduates of the institution for the purpose of data collection.
4. Applicant's life experience. This section may not be construed to prohibit an
educational institution from considering in the admissions process an applicant's discussion
of how a familial relationship to a donor or graduate affected the applicant's life.